fi: Taide ja viihde > Harrastukset ja taiteet > Soitin- ja orkesteritarvikkeet > Puupuhallintarvikkeet > Oboe- ja englannintorvitarvikkeet: Oboen huolto ja puhdistus; Oboekotelot ja -pussit; Oboen osat; Oboen telineet; Oboen suuttimet; Oboen hihnat ja tuet
sl-SI: Kultura in zabava > Hobiji in ustvarjalne umetnosti > Dodatki za glasbila in orkestre > Dodatki za lesna pihala > Dodatki za oboo in angleški rog: Nega in čiščenje oboe; Kovčki in torbe za oboe; Deli za oboo; Podstavki in stojala za oboo; Jezički za oboo; Trakovi in nosilci za oboo
vi: Nghệ thuật và giải trí > Sở thích và nghệ thuật sáng tạo > Phụ kiện dàn nhạc và nhạc cụ > Phụ kiện cho nhạc cụ hơi > Phụ kiện kèn ô-boa: Sản phẩm vệ sinh và chăm sóc kèn ô-boa; Hộp và túi đựng kèn ô-boa; Phụ tùng kèn ô-boa; Giá và chân để kèn ô-boa; Dăm kèn ô-boa; Đai và kệ đỡ kèn ô-boa
ro-RO: Artă și divertisment > Hobby-uri și artă > Accesorii pentru instrumente muzicale și orchestră > Accesorii pentru instrumente de suflat > Accesorii pentru oboi și corn englezesc: Îngrijirea și curățarea oboiului; Huse și genți pentru oboi; Piese pentru oboi; Conuri și suporturi pentru oboi; Ancii oboi; Curele și suporturi pentru oboi
de: Kunst & Unterhaltung > Hobby & Kunst > Zubehör für Musikinstrumente > Zubehör für Holzblasinstrumente > Oboenzubehör: Oboenpflege & -reinigung; Koffer & Transporttaschen für Oboen; Oboenteile; Oboenhalter & -ständer; Oboenblätter; Oboenriemen & -stützen
ko: 아트/엔터테인먼트 > 취미/예술 > 악기/오케스트라 부대용품 > 목관악기 부대용품 > 오보에/잉글리시 호른 부대용품: 오보에 관리/청소 용품; 오보에 케이스/패딩 가방; 오보에 부품; 오보에 거치대/스탠드; 오보에 리드; 오보에 스트랩/받침대
da: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og håndarbejde > Musikinstrumenter – tilbehør > Træblæserinstrumenter – tilbehør > Obo – tilbehør: Obo – pleje og rengøring; Obo – tasker og gigbags; Obo – dele; Obo – stativer; Obo – rørblade; Obo – remme
pt-PT: Artes e lazer > Passatempos e artes criativas > Acessórios de instrumentos musicais e orquestra > Acessórios de madeiras > Acessórios para oboé e corne inglês: Limpeza e cuidado de oboé; Sacos e estojos para oboé; Peças de oboé; Suportes e apoios para oboé; Palhetas para oboé; Correias e suportes para oboé
hu: Művészet és szórakoztatás > Hobbik és kreatív művészet > Hangszer és zenekari kiegészítők > Fafúvóshangszer-kiegészítők > Oboa- és angolkürt-kiegészítők: Oboaápolás és -tisztítás; Oboatokok és -táskák; Oboaalkatrészek; Oboacsapok és -tartók; Oboanádak; Oboapántok és -támasztékok
nl: Kunst en entertainment > Hobby's en creatieve vaardigheden > Accessoires voor muziekinstrumenten > Accessoires voor houten blaasinstrumenten > Accessoires voor hobo: Onderhoud en reiniging van hobo; Koffers en hoezen voor hobo; Onderdelen voor hobo; Statieven en standaards voor hobo; Hoborieten; Bandjes en steunen voor hobo
th: ศิลปะและความบันเทิง > งานอดิเรกและศิลปะสร้างสรรค์ > เครื่องดนตรีและอุปกรณ์ออร์เคสตรา > อุปกรณ์เครื่องเป่า > อุปกรณ์โอโบและอิงลิช ฮอร์น: การดูแลและทำความสะอาดโอโบ; ที่ใส่และกระเป๋าโอโบ; ชิ้นส่วนโอโบ; ที่ตั้งและเพ็กของโอโบ; ลิ้นโอโบ; สายสะพายและที่รองโอโบ
ru: Искусство и развлечения > Хобби и творчество > Аксессуары для музыкальных инструментов и игры в оркестре > Аксессуары для деревянных духовых инструментов > Аксессуары для гобоев: Чистка гобоев и уход за ними; Футляры и чехлы для гобоев; Детали для гобоев; Упоры и стойки для гобоев; Трости для гобоев; Ремни и подставки для гобоев
sk-SK: Umenie a zábava > Záľuby a tvorivé dielne > Príslušenstvo pre hudobné nástroje > Príslušenstvo pre drevené dychové nástroje > Príslušenstvo pre hoboj a anglický roh: Starostlivosť a čistenie hoboja; Hobojové puzdrá a tašky; Diely hoboja; Kolíky a stojany pre hoboj; Hobojové strojčeky; Hobojové pásy a podpery
it: Arte e svago > Hobby e arti creative > Accessori per orchestre e strumenti musicali > Accessori per legni > Accessori per oboe: Cura e pulizia oboe; Custodie e gigbag oboe; Pezzi per oboe; Supporti per oboe; Ance per oboe; Collarini e supporti oboe
sv: Konst och underhållning > Hobby och skapande > Tillbehör till musikinstrument > Tillbehör till träblåsinstrument > Tillbehör för oboe och engelskt horn: Vård och rengöring av oboer; Etuier och gigbags för oboer; Oboedelar; Oboestativ; Oboerör; Remmar och stöd för oboer
ja: 芸術・エンターテイメント > 趣味・コレクション > 楽器関連用品 > 木管楽器用品 > オーボエ用品: オーボエお手入れ用品; オーボエ用ケース・ギグバッグ; オーボエ用パーツ; オーボエ用ペグ・スタンド; オーボエ用リード; オーボエ用ストラップ
zh-TW: 藝術/娛樂 > 嗜好和創作藝術 > 樂器配件 > 木管樂器配件 > 雙簧管和英國管配件: 雙簧管清潔保養; 雙簧管盒; 雙簧管零件; 雙簧管支架; 雙簧管簧片; 雙簧管背帶
pl: Sztuka i rozrywka > Hobby i sztuki piękne > Akcesoria do instrumentów muzycznych > Akcesoria do instrumentów dętych drewnianych > Akcesoria do obojów: Elementy konserwujące i czyszczące do obojów; Pokrowce i futerały na oboje; Części do obojów; Wieszaki i stojaki na oboje; Stroiki do obojów; Paski i podpórki do obojów
es: Arte y ocio > Hobbies y artes creativas > Accesorios para instrumentos musicales y de orquesta > Accesorios para instrumentos de viento-madera > Accesorios para oboe: Limpieza y cuidado del oboe; Fundas y estuches para oboe; Piezas para oboe; Bases y clavijas para oboe; Cañas para oboe; Soportes y cordones para oboe
bg-BG: Изкуства и развлечения > Хобита и творчески изкуства > Аксесоари за музикални инструменти и оркестри > Аксесоари за дървени духови инструменти > Аксесоари за обой и английски рог: Грижи и почистване на обой; Калъфи и чанти за обой; Части за обой; Подпори и стойки за обой; Платъци за обой; Ремъци и опори за обой
pt-BR: Artes e entretenimento > Hobbies e artes > Acessórios para instrumentos musicais e orquestras > Acessórios para instrumentos de sopro de madeira > Acessórios para oboé: Manutenção e limpeza de oboé; Estojos e gig bags para oboé; Peças para oboé; Apoios e suportes para oboé; Palhetas para oboé; Cordões e suportes para oboé
el: Τέχνες & Ψυχαγωγία > Χόμπι & Δημιουργικές Τέχνες > Αξεσουάρ μουσικών οργάνων & ορχήστρας > Αξεσουάρ ξύλινων πνευστών οργάνων > Αξεσουάρ για όμποε & αγγλικό κόρνο: Φροντίδα & καθαρισμός Όμποε; Θήκες & μαλακές θήκες όμποε; Εξαρτήματα όμποε; Κλειδιά & βάσεις για όμποε; Καλάμια όμποε; Ιμάντες & στηρίγματα όμποε
en: Arts & Entertainment > Hobbies & Creative Arts > Musical Instrument & Orchestra Accessories > Woodwind Instrument Accessories > Oboe & English Horn Accessories: Oboe Care & Cleaning; Oboe Cases & Gigbags; Oboe Parts; Oboe Pegs & Stands; Oboe Reeds; Oboe Straps & Supports
cs: Umění a zábava > Hobby, hudba a výtvarné umění > Hudební nástroje – příslušenství > Dřevěné dechové nástroje – příslušenství > Hoboje – příslušenství: Údržba a čištění hoboje; Kufry a pouzdra na hoboje; Součásti hoboje; Podpěry a stojany na hoboj; Hobojové strojky; Popruhy pro hoboje
lt-LT: Menai ir pramogos > Hobiai ir menai > Muzikos instrumentai ir orkestro priedai > Medinių pučiamųjų instrumentų priedai > Obojų ir angliškų ragų priedai: Obojų priežiūra ir valymas; Obojų dėklai ir krepšiai; Obojų dalys; Obojų kaiščiai ir stovai; Obojus liežuvėliai; Obojų diržai ir atramos
zh-CN: 艺术与娱乐 > 爱好/艺术创作 > 乐器与管弦乐队配件 > 木管乐器配件 > 双簧管/英国管配件: 双簧管清洁保养; 双簧管盒/包; 双簧管零件; 双簧管托架/支架; 双簧管簧片; 双簧管背带与支撑带
nb: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og kreativitet > Tilbehør til musikkinstrumenter og orkestre > Tilbehør til treblåseinstrumenter > Tilbehør til obo og engelsk horn: Pleie og rengjøring av obo; Kasser og vesker til obo; Obodeler; Støtter og stativer til obo; Obobørster; Stropper og støtter for obo
fr: Arts et loisirs > Loisirs et arts créatifs > Accessoires pour instruments de musique et orchestres > Accessoires pour instruments à vent > Accessoires pour hautbois: Entretien et nettoyage des hautbois; Étuis et housses pour hautbois; Pièces pour hautbois; Supports pour hautbois; Anches pour hautbois; Cordons et harnais pour hautbois
tr: Sanat ve Eğlence > Hobiler ve Sanatsal Çalışmalar > Müzik Aleti ve Orkestra Aksesuarları > Nefesli Çalgı Aksesuarları > Obua Aksesuarları: Obua Bakım ve Temizliği; Obua Çanta ve Kılıfları; Obua Parçaları; Obua Sehpa ve Stantları; Obua Kamışları; Obua Askı ve Destekleri
hr-HR: Umjetnost i zabava > Hobiji i kreativne umjetnosti > Pribor za glazbala i orkestar > Pribor za drvena puhačka glazbala > Pribor za obou i engleski rog: Održavanje i čišćenje oboe; Koferi i koncertne torbe za obou; Dijelovi za obou; Oslonci i stalci za obou; Jezičci za obou; Trake i držači za obou